Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 2

Disclaimer Of Property

Subchapter 1

— Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act [Repealed.]

28-2-101 — 28-2-109. [Repealed.]

28-2-201. Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).”

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 1; 2009, No. 346, § 1.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999)” for “Arkansas Disclaimer of Property Interests Act.”

28-2-202. Definitions.

In this subchapter:

“Disclaimant” means the person to whom a disclaimed interest or power would have passed had the disclaimer not been made.

“Disclaimed interest” means the interest that would have passed to the disclaimant had the disclaimer not been made.

“Disclaimer” means the refusal to accept an interest in or power over property.

“Fiduciary” means a personal representative, trustee, agent acting under a power of attorney, or other person authorized to act as a fiduciary with respect to the property of another person.

“Jointly held property” means property held in the name of two or more persons under an arrangement in which all holders have concurrent interests and under which the last surviving holder is entitled to the whole of the property.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“State” means a State of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan native village, recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a State.

“Trust” means:

an express trust, charitable or noncharitable, with additions thereto, whenever and however created; and

a trust created pursuant to a statute, judgment, or decree which requires the trust to be administered in the manner of an express trust.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 2.

28-2-203. Scope.

This subchapter applies to disclaimers of any interest in or power over property, whenever created.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 3.

28-2-204. Subchapter supplemented by other law.

Unless displaced by a provision of this subchapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this subchapter.

This subchapter does not limit any right of a person to waive, release, disclaim, or renounce an interest in or power over property under a law other than this subchapter.

To be effective, a disclaimer must be in a writing or other record, declare the disclaimer, describe the interest or power disclaimed, be signed by the person making the disclaimer, and be delivered or filed in the manner provided in § 28-2-212. In this subsection:

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Signed” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to:

execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

A partial disclaimer may be expressed as a fraction, percentage, monetary amount, term of years, limitation of a power, or any other interest or estate in the property.

A disclaimer becomes irrevocable when it is delivered or filed pursuant to § 28-2-212 or when it becomes effective as provided in §§ 28-2-206 — 28-2-211, whichever occurs later.

A disclaimer made under this subchapter is not a transfer, assignment, or release.

“Future interest” means an interest that takes effect in possession or enjoyment, if at all, later than the time of its creation.

“Time of distribution” means the time when a disclaimed interest would have taken effect in possession or enjoyment.

If the instrument does not contain a provision described in subdivision (b)(2), the following rules apply:

If the disclaimant is not an individual, the disclaimed interest passes as if the disclaimant did not exist.

If the disclaimant is an individual, except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b)(3)(C) and (D), the disclaimed interest passes as if the disclaimant had died immediately before the time of distribution.

If by law or under the instrument, the descendants of the disclaimant would share in the disclaimed interest by any method of representation had the disclaimant died before the time of distribution, the disclaimed interest passes only to the descendants of the disclaimant who survive the time of distribution.

If the disclaimed interest would pass to the disclaimant's estate had the disclaimant died before the time of distribution, the disclaimed interest instead passes by representation to the descendants of the disclaimant who survive the time of distribution. If no descendant of the disclaimant survives the time of distribution, the disclaimed interest passes to those persons, including the state but excluding the disclaimant, and in such shares as would succeed to the transferor's intestate estate under the intestate succession law of the transferor's domicile had the transferor died at the time of distribution. However, if the transferor's surviving spouse is living but is remarried at the time of distribution, the transferor is deemed to have died unmarried at the time of distribution.

Upon the disclaimer of a preceding interest, a future interest held by a person other than the disclaimant takes effect as if the disclaimant had died or ceased to exist immediately before the time of distribution, but a future interest held by the disclaimant is not accelerated in possession or enjoyment.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment reversed the sequence of (a)(1) and (a)(2); and rewrote (b)(3).

Ark. L. Rev.

Carroll, Uniform Laws in Arkansas, 52 Ark. L. Rev. 313.

Where the four children of the intestate who were alive at his death and the five children of the decedent's son who had predeceased him had executed disclaimers of interest in the estate with the purpose of having certain property pass to his widow as the surviving spouse, but the other 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren did not execute disclaimers, the property in question did not pass to the widow because under §28-9-214 the estate would have passed to the widow only if there were no surviving descendants. The disclaimers in this case resulted in the property in issue passing to the 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren who did not execute disclaimers and not to the widow as the surviving spouse. Hunt v. United States, 566 F. Supp. 356 (E.D. Ark. 1983).

The inheritance property taxpayer held under state law rendered the inheritance “property” or “rights to property” belonging to him within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. 6321 and subject to federal tax liens, despite the taxpayer's exercise of his state-law right to disclaim the interest retroactively. Drye v. United States, 528 U.S. 49, 120 S. Ct. 474, 145 L. Ed. 2d 466 (1999).

A third party may execute against a spouse's interest in a tenancy by the entirety, subject to the other spouse's continued rights of possession and survivorship, and interest in one-half of the rents and profits. Morris v. Solesbee, 48 Ark. App. 123, 892 S.W.2d 281 (1995).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 4.

28-2-205. Power to disclaim — General requirements, when irrevocable.

A person may disclaim, in whole or part, any interest in or power over property, including a power of appointment. A person may disclaim the interest or power even if its creator imposed a spendthrift provision or similar restriction on transfer or a restriction or limitation on the right to disclaim.

Except to the extent a fiduciary's right to disclaim is expressly restricted or limited by another statute of this State or by the instrument creating the fiduciary relationship, a fiduciary may disclaim, in whole or part, any interest in or power over property, including a power of appointment, whether acting in a personal or representative capacity. A fiduciary may disclaim the interest or power even if its creator imposed a spendthrift provision or similar restriction on transfer or a restriction or limitation on the right to disclaim, or an instrument other than the instrument that created the fiduciary relationship imposed a restriction or limitation on the right to disclaim.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 5.

28-2-206. Disclaimer of interest in property.

In this section:

Except for a disclaimer governed by §28-2-207 or §28-2-208, the following rules apply to a disclaimer of an interest in property:

The disclaimer takes effect as of the time the instrument creating the interest becomes irrevocable, or, if the interest arose under the law of intestate succession, as of the time of the intestate's death.

The disclaimed interest passes according to any provision in the instrument creating the interest providing for the disposition of the interest, should it be disclaimed, or of disclaimed interests in general.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 6; 2005, No. 1962, § 116; 2009, No. 346, § 2.

28-2-207. Disclaimer of rights of survivorship in jointly held property.

Upon the death of a holder of jointly held property, a surviving holder may disclaim, in whole or part, the greater of:

a fractional share of the property determined by dividing the number one by the number of joint holders alive immediately before the death of the holder to whose death the disclaimer relates; or

all of the property except that part of the value of the entire interest attributable to the contribution furnished by the disclaimant.

A disclaimer under subsection (a) takes effect as of the death of the holder of jointly held property to whose death the disclaimer relates.

An interest in jointly held property disclaimed by a surviving holder of the property passes as if the disclaimant predeceased the holder to whose death the disclaimer relates.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 7.

28-2-208. Disclaimer of interest by trustee.

If a trustee disclaims an interest in property that otherwise would have become trust property, the interest does not become trust property.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 8.

28-2-209. Disclaimer of power of appointment or other power not held in fiduciary capacity.

If a holder disclaims a power of appointment or other power not held in a fiduciary capacity, the following rules apply:

If the holder has not exercised the power, the disclaimer takes effect as of the time the instrument creating the power becomes irrevocable.

If the holder has exercised the power and the disclaimer is of a power other than a presently exercisable general power of appointment, the disclaimer takes effect immediately after the last exercise of the power.

The instrument creating the power is construed as if the power expired when the disclaimer became effective.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 9.

28-2-210. Disclaimer by appointee, object, or taker in default of exercise of power of appointment.

A disclaimer of an interest in property by an appointee of a power of appointment takes effect as of the time the instrument by which the holder exercises the power becomes irrevocable.

A disclaimer of an interest in property by an object or taker in default of an exercise of a power of appointment takes effect as of the time the instrument creating the power becomes irrevocable.

A disclaimer under this section is effective as to another fiduciary if the disclaimer so provides and the fiduciary disclaiming has the authority to bind the estate, trust, or other person for whom the fiduciary is acting.

an annuity or insurance policy;

an account with a designation for payment on death;

a security registered in beneficiary form;

a pension, profit-sharing, retirement, or other employment-related benefit plan; or

any other nonprobate transfer at death.

In the case of an interest in a testamentary trust:

a disclaimer must be delivered to the trustee then serving, or if no trustee is then serving, to the personal representative of the decedent's estate; or

if no personal representative is then serving, it must be filed with a court having jurisdiction to enforce the trust.

In the case of an interest in an inter vivos trust:

a disclaimer must be delivered to the trustee then serving;

if no trustee is then serving, it must be filed with a court having jurisdiction to enforce the trust; or

if the disclaimer is made before the time the instrument creating the trust becomes irrevocable, it must be delivered to the settlor of a revocable trust or the transferor of the interest.

In the case of an interest created by a beneficiary designation made before the time the designation becomes irrevocable, a disclaimer must be delivered to the person making the beneficiary designation.

In the case of an interest created by a beneficiary designation made after the time the designation becomes irrevocable, a disclaimer must be delivered to the person obligated to distribute the interest.

In the case of a disclaimer by a surviving holder of jointly held property, the disclaimer must be delivered to the person to whom the disclaimed interest passes.

In the case of a disclaimer by an object or taker in default of exercise of a power of appointment at any time after the power was created:

the disclaimer must be delivered to the holder of the power or to the fiduciary acting under the instrument that created the power; or

if no fiduciary is then serving, it must be filed with a court having authority to appoint the fiduciary.

In the case of a disclaimer by an appointee of a nonfiduciary power of appointment:

the disclaimer must be delivered to the holder, the personal representative of the holder's estate, or to the fiduciary under the instrument that created the power; or

if no fiduciary is then serving, it must be filed with a court having authority to appoint the fiduciary.

In the case of a disclaimer by a fiduciary of a power over a trust or estate, the disclaimer must be delivered as provided in subsection (c), (d), or (e), as if the power disclaimed were an interest in property.

In the case of a disclaimer of a power by an agent, the disclaimer must be delivered to the principal or the principal's representative.

the disclaimant accepts the interest sought to be disclaimed;

the disclaimant voluntarily assigns, conveys, encumbers, pledges, or transfers the interest sought to be disclaimed or contracts to do so; or

a judicial sale of the interest sought to be disclaimed occurs.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 10.

28-2-211. Disclaimer of power held in fiduciary capacity.

If a fiduciary disclaims a power held in a fiduciary capacity which has not been exercised, the disclaimer takes effect as of the time the instrument creating the power becomes irrevocable.

If a fiduciary disclaims a power held in a fiduciary capacity which has been exercised, the disclaimer takes effect immediately after the last exercise of the power.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 11.

28-2-212. Delivery or filing.

In this section, “beneficiary designation” means an instrument, other than an instrument creating a trust, naming the beneficiary of:

Subject to subsections (c) through (l), delivery of a disclaimer may be effected by personal delivery, first-class mail, or any other method likely to result in its receipt.

In the case of an interest created under the law of intestate succession or an interest created by will, other than an interest in a testamentary trust:

a disclaimer must be delivered to the personal representative of the decedent's estate; or

if no personal representative is then serving, it must be filed with a court having jurisdiction to appoint the personal representative.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 12.

28-2-213. When disclaimer barred or limited.

A disclaimer is barred by a written waiver of the right to disclaim.

A disclaimer of an interest in property is barred if any of the following events occur before the disclaimer becomes effective:

A disclaimer, in whole or part, of the future exercise of a power held in a fiduciary capacity is not barred by its previous exercise.

A disclaimer, in whole or part, of the future exercise of a power not held in a fiduciary capacity is not barred by its previous exercise unless the power is exercisable in favor of the disclaimant.

A disclaimer is barred or limited if so provided by law other than this subchapter.

A disclaimer of a power over property which is barred by this section is ineffective. A disclaimer of an interest in property which is barred by this section takes effect as a transfer of the interest disclaimed to the persons who would have taken the interest under this subchapter had the disclaimer not been barred.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 13.

28-2-214. Tax-qualified disclaimer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, if as a result of a disclaimer or transfer the disclaimed or transferred interest is treated pursuant to the provisions of Title 26 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter amended, or any successor statute thereto, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, as never having been transferred to the disclaimant, then the disclaimer or transfer is effective as a disclaimer under this subchapter.

In order for a disclaimer made under the provisions of this subchapter to be effective as a tax-qualified disclaimer pursuant to the provisions of Title 26 of the United States Code, the disclaimer must be made within the time periods set out in Title 26, Section 2518 of the United States Code, generally within 9 months from the day that the interest being disclaimed was created.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 14.

28-2-215. Disclaimer of interest in real property — Recording of disclaimer.

If real property or an interest therein is disclaimed, a copy of the disclaimer shall be recorded in the office of the circuit clerk of the county in which the property or interest disclaimed is located.

If an interest in or relating to real property is disclaimed and recorded as provided in this section, the spouse of the person entering the disclaimer, if the spouse has consented to the disclaimer in writing, shall be automatically debarred from any dower or curtesy interest in the real estate to which the spouse would have been lawfully entitled except for the disclaimer.

Failure to file, record, or register the disclaimer does not affect its validity as between the disclaimant and persons to whom the property interest or power passes by reason of the disclaimer.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section of the Arkansas Disclaimer of Property Interests Act differs substantially from Section 15 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (U.L.A. 1999).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 15.

28-2-216. Minor, incompetent, or deceased beneficiary.

A guardian of the property or an executor or administrator of the estate of a minor, incompetent, or deceased beneficiary may, if the fiduciary deems it to be in the best interest of those concerned with the estate of the beneficiary and of those who will take the beneficiary's interest by virtue of the disclaimer and is not detrimental to the best interest of the beneficiary, with or without an order of the court having jurisdiction, shall execute and file a disclaimer on behalf of the beneficiary within the time and in the manner in which the beneficiary himself or herself could disclaim if he or she were living, of legal age, or competent.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 16.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section of the Arkansas Disclaimer of Property Interests Act differs substantially from Section 16 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (U.L.A. 1999).

28-2-217. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This subchapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b)).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 17.

28-2-218. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Uniform Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among States that enact it.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 18.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 2003, No. 610, codified as §§28-2-201 —28-2-218,28-2-220, and28-2-221.

28-2-219. [Reserved.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 19 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (U.L.A. 1999, as amended), a severability provision, was not adopted in Arkansas.

28-2-220. Effective date.

This act takes effect on September 1, 2003.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 19.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 2003, No. 610, codified as §§28-2-201 —28-2-218,28-2-220, and28-2-221.

28-2-221. Repeals.

Sections 28-2-101 — 28-2-109 are repealed.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 610, § 20.

Chapters 3-7

[Reserved.]

[Reserved]

Subchapter 2

— Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999)